Utah, session 2025S2, SB2001.
Section 1. Section 20A-1-509.1 is amended to read:20A-1-509.1. Procedure for filling midterm vacancy in county or district with 15 or more attorneys.(1)When a vacancy occurs in the office of county or district attorney in a county or district having 15 or more attorneys who are licensed active members in good standing with the Utah State Bar and registered voters, the vacancy shall be filled as provided in this section.(2)(a)The requirements of this Subsection (2) apply when the office of county attorney or district attorney becomes vacant and:(i)the vacant office has an unexpired term of two years or more; and(ii)the vacancy occurs before the first day of the applicable declaration of candidacy filing period described in Section 20A-9-201.5.(b)When the conditions established in Subsection (2)(a) are met, the county clerk shall notify the public and each registered political party that the vacancy exists.(c)All persons intending to become candidates for the vacant office shall:(i)file a declaration of candidacy according to the procedures and requirements of Chapter 9, Part 2, Candidate Qualifications and Declarations of Candidacy;(ii)if nominated as a party candidate or qualified as an independent or write-in candidate under Chapter 9, Candidate Qualifications and Nominating Procedures, run in the regular general election; and(iii)if elected, complete the unexpired term of the person who created the vacancy.(d)If the vacancy occurs during the applicable declaration of candidacy filing period described in Section 20A-9-201.5:(i)the time for filing a declaration of candidacy under Section 20A-9-202 shall be extended until 5 p.m. on the first business day that is no later than seven calendar days after the last day of the applicable declaration of candidacy filing period described in Section 20A-9-201.5; and(ii)the county clerk shall notify the public and each registered political party that the vacancy exists.(3)(a)The requirements of this Subsection (3) apply when the office of county attorney or district attorney becomes vacant and:(i)the vacant office has an unexpired term of two years or more; and(ii)the vacancy occurs after the third Thursday in March of the even-numbered year but more than 75 calendar days before the regular primary election.(b)When the conditions established in Subsection (3)(a) are met, the county clerk shall:(i)notify the public and each registered political party that the vacancy exists; and(ii)identify the date and time by which a person interested in becoming a candidate shall file a declaration of candidacy.(c)All persons intending to become candidates for the vacant office shall:(i)no later than 5 p.m. on the first business day that is at least five calendar days after the day on which the county clerk gives the notice described in Subsection (3)(b)(i), file a declaration of candidacy for the vacant office as required by Chapter 9, Part 2, Candidate Qualifications and Declarations of Candidacy; and(ii)if elected, complete the unexpired term of the person who created the vacancy.(d)The county central committee of each party shall:(i)select a candidate or candidates from among those qualified candidates who have filed declarations of candidacy; and(ii)certify the name of the candidate or candidates to the county clerk:(A)no later than 5 p.m. on the last business day that is at least 60 calendar days before the day of the regular primary election; or(B)electronically, before midnight no later than 60 calendar days before the day of the regular primary election.(4)(a)The requirements of this Subsection (4) apply when the office of county attorney or district attorney becomes vacant and:(i)the vacant office has an unexpired term of two years or more; and(ii)75 calendar days or less remain before the regular primary election but more than 65 calendar days remain before the regular general election.(b)When the conditions established in Subsection (4)(a) are met, the county central committees of each registered political party that wishes to submit a candidate for the office shall, not later than five calendar days after the day on which the vacancy occurs, certify the name of one candidate to the county clerk for placement on the regular general election ballot.(c)The candidate elected shall complete the unexpired term of the person who created the vacancy.(5)(a)The requirements of this Subsection (5) apply when the office of county attorney or district attorney becomes vacant and:(i)the vacant office has an unexpired term of less than two years; or(ii)the vacant office has an unexpired term of two years or more but 65 calendar days or less remain before the next regular general election.(b)When the conditions established in Subsection (5)(a) are met, the county legislative body shall give notice of the vacancy to: (i)the county clerk; and(ii)the county central committee of the same political party of the prior officeholder. (c)The county legislative body shall invite the committee described in Subsection (5)(b)(ii) to submit the names of three nominees to fill the vacancy.(d)The county central committee shall, within 30 calendar days after the day on which the county legislative body gives the notice described in Subsection (5)(b)(ii), submit to the county legislative body the names of three nominees to fill the vacancy.(e)The county legislative body shall, within 45 calendar days after the vacancy occurs, appoint one of those nominees to serve out the unexpired term.(f)If the county legislative body fails to appoint a person to fill the vacancy within 45 calendar days, the county clerk shall send to the governor a letter that:(i)informs the governor that the county legislative body has failed to appoint a person to fill the vacancy within the statutory time period; and(ii)contains the list of nominees submitted by the party central committee.(g)The governor shall appoint a person to fill the vacancy from that list of nominees within 30 calendar days after the day on which the governor receives the letter described in Subsection (5)(f).(h)A person appointed to fill the vacancy under this Subsection (5) shall complete the unexpired term of the person who created the vacancy.(6)A person seeking appointment to fill a vacancy described in Subsection (5)(a) shall, no later than the deadline for the person to file a financial report under Section 17-70-403:(a)complete a conflict of interest disclosure statement in accordance with Section 17-70-304; and(b)submit the conflict of interest disclosure statement to the county legislative body and the county clerk.(7)(a)The county clerk shall make each conflict of interest disclosure statement made by a person described in Subsection (6) available for public inspection by posting an electronic copy of the statement on the county's website for at least 10 calendar days after the day on which the county legislative body appoints a person to fill the vacancy.(b)The county clerk shall post the electronic statement described in Subsection (7)(a) no later than two business days after the day on which the county clerk receives the statement.(8)A vacancy in the office described in Subsection (1) does not occur unless the person occupying the office:(a)has left the office; or(b)submits an irrevocable letter of resignation to the county legislative body.(9)Nothing in this section prevents or prohibits independent candidates from filing a declaration of candidacy for the office within the required time limits.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 20A-2-107 is amended to read:20A-2-107. Designating or changing party affiliation -- Times permitted.(1)As used in this section, "change of affiliation deadline" means:(a)for an election held in an even-numbered year in which a presidential election will be held, the day after the declaration of candidacy deadline described in Subsection 20A-9-201.5(2)(b)20A-9-201.5(1); or(b)for an election held in an even-numbered year in which a presidential election will not be held, April 1.(2)The county clerk shall:(a)except as provided in Subsection (6) or 20A-2-107.5(3), record the party affiliation designated by the voter on the voter registration form as the voter's party affiliation; or(b)if no political party affiliation is designated by the voter on the voter registration form:(i)except as provided in Subsection (2)(b)(ii), record the voter's party affiliation as the party that the voter designated the last time that the voter designated a party on a voter registration form, unless the voter more recently registered as "unaffiliated"; or(ii)record the voter's party affiliation as "unaffiliated" if the voter:(A)did not previously designate a party;(B)most recently designated the voter's party affiliation as "unaffiliated"; or(C)did not previously register.(3)(a)Any registered voter may designate or change the voter's political party affiliation by complying with the procedures and requirements of this Subsection (3).(b)A registered voter may designate or change the voter's political party affiliation by filing with the county clerk, the municipal clerk, or the lieutenant governor a voter registration form or another signed form that identifies the registered political party with which the voter chooses to affiliate.(c)Except as provided in Subsection (3)(d), a voter registration form or another signed form designating or changing a voter's political party affiliation takes effect when the county clerk receives the signed form.(d)The party affiliation of a voter who changes party affiliation, or who becomes unaffiliated from a political party, at any time on or after the change of affiliation deadline and on or before the date of the regular primary election, takes effect the day after the statewide canvass for the regular primary election.(4)For purposes of Subsection (3)(d), a form described in Subsection (3)(c) is received by the county clerk before the change of affiliation deadline if:(a)the individual submits the form in person at the county clerk's office no later than 5 p.m. on the last business day before the change of affiliation deadline;(b)the individual submits the form electronically through the system described in Section 20A-2-206, at or before 11:59 p.m. before the day of the change of affiliation deadline; or(c)the individual's form is clearly postmarked before the change of affiliation deadline.(5)Subsection (3)(d) does not apply to the party affiliation designated by a voter on a voter registration form if:(a)the voter has not previously been registered to vote in the state; or(b)the voter's most recent party affiliation was changed to "unaffiliated" by a county clerk under Subsection (6).(6)If the most recent party affiliation designated by a voter is for a political party that is no longer a registered political party, the county clerk shall:(a)change the voter's party affiliation to "unaffiliated"; and(b)notify the voter electronically or by mail:(i)that the voter's affiliation has been changed to "unaffiliated" because the most recent party affiliation designated by the voter is for a political party that is no longer a registered political party; and(ii)of the methods and deadlines for changing the voter's party affiliation.

Section 3:
Section 3. Section 20A-9-201 is amended to read:20A-9-201. Declarations of candidacy -- Candidacy for more than one office or of more than one political party prohibited with exceptions -- General filing and form requirements -- Affidavit of impecuniosity.(1)Before filing a declaration of candidacy for election to any office, an individual shall:(a)be a United States citizen;(b)meet the legal requirements of that office; and(c)if seeking a registered political party's nomination as a candidate for elective office, state:(i)the registered political party of which the individual is a member; or(ii)that the individual is not a member of a registered political party.(2)(a)Except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), an individual may not:(i)file a declaration of candidacy for, or be a candidate for, more than one office in Utah during any election year;(ii)appear on the ballot as the candidate of more than one political party; or(iii)file a declaration of candidacy for a registered political party of which the individual is not a member, except to the extent that the registered political party permits otherwise in the registered political party's bylaws.(b)(i)An individual may file a declaration of candidacy for, or be a candidate for, president or vice president of the United States and another office, if the individual resigns the individual's candidacy for the other office after the individual is officially nominated for president or vice president of the United States.(ii)An individual may file a declaration of candidacy for, or be a candidate for, more than one justice court judge office.(iii)An individual may file a declaration of candidacy for lieutenant governor even if the individual filed a declaration of candidacy for another office in the same election year if the individual withdraws as a candidate for the other office in accordance with Subsection 20A-9-202(6) before filing the declaration of candidacy for lieutenant governor.(iv)For the 2026 election year only, an individual who files a declaration of candidacy to seek the nomination of a qualified political party for constitutional office, multicounty office, or county office:(A)may also be a candidate for United States representative;(B)may, if the individual desires to use the signature-gathering process to qualify for the primary election ballot for the office of United States representative, file a notice of intent to gather signatures for, and gather signatures for, that office; and(C)shall, before filing a declaration of candidacy for the office of United States representative, withdraw as a candidate for the constitutional office, multicounty office, or county office for which the individual filed a declaration of candidacy.(3)(a)Except for a candidate for president or vice president of the United States, before the filing officer may accept any declaration of candidacy, the filing officer shall:(i)read to the individual the constitutional and statutory qualification requirements for the office that the individual is seeking;(ii)require the individual to state whether the individual meets the requirements described in Subsection (3)(a)(i);(iii)if the declaration of candidacy is for a county office, inform the individual that an individual who holds a county elected office may not, at the same time, hold a municipal elected office; and(iv)if the declaration of candidacy is for a legislative office, inform the individual that Utah Constitution, Article VI, Section 6, prohibits a person who holds a public office of profit or trust, under authority of the United States or Utah, from being a member of the Legislature.(b)(i)Before accepting a declaration of candidacy for the office of county attorney, the county clerk shall ensure that the individual filing that declaration of candidacy is:(A)a United States citizen;(B)an attorney licensed to practice law in the state who is an active member in good standing of the Utah State Bar;(C)a registered voter in the county in which the individual is seeking office; and(D)a current resident of the county in which the individual is seeking office and either has been a resident of that county for at least one year before the date of the election or was appointed and is currently serving as county attorney and became a resident of the county within 30 calendar days after appointment to the office.(ii)An individual filing a declaration of candidacy for the office of county attorney shall submit with the individual's declaration:(A)a letter from the Utah Supreme Court, affirming that the individual is an attorney in good standing;(B)proof of the individual's application with the Utah State Bar, with an affidavit describing the status of the individual's application; or(C)an affidavit describing how the individual intends to comply with the requirements for office of county attorney described in Subsection (3)(b)(i), prior to taking office.(iii)In addition to the requirements described in Subsection (3)(b)(ii), an individual shall also provide the filing officer with the individual's license number with:(A)the Utah State Bar, if the individual is a member; or(B)any other state bar association, if the individual is a member.(c)(i)Before accepting a declaration of candidacy for the office of district attorney, the county clerk shall ensure that, as of the date of the election, the individual filing that declaration of candidacy is:(A)a United States citizen;(B)an attorney licensed to practice law in the state who is an active member in good standing of the Utah State Bar;(C)a registered voter in the prosecution district in which the individual is seeking office; and(D)a current resident of the prosecution district in which the individual is seeking office and either will have been a resident of that prosecution district for at least one year before the date of the election or was appointed and is currently serving as district attorney or county attorney and became a resident of the prosecution district within 30 calendar days after receiving appointment to the office.(ii)An individual filing a declaration of candidacy for the office of district attorney shall submit with the individual's declaration:(A)a letter from the Utah Supreme Court, affirming that the individual is an attorney in good standing;(B)proof of the individual's application with the Utah State Bar, with an affidavit describing the status of the individual's application; or(C)an affidavit describing how the individual intends to comply with the requirements for office of district attorney described in Subsection (3)(c)(i), prior to taking office.(iii)In addition to the requirements described in Subsection (3)(c)(ii), an individual shall also provide the filing officer with the individual's license number with:(A)the Utah State Bar, if the individual is a member; or(B)any other state bar association, if the individual is a member.(d)Before accepting a declaration of candidacy for the office of county sheriff, the county clerk shall ensure that the individual filing the declaration:(i)is a United States citizen;(ii)is a registered voter in the county in which the individual seeks office;(iii)(A)has successfully met the standards and training requirements established for law enforcement officers under Title 53, Chapter 6, Part 2, Peace Officer Training and Certification Act; or(B)has met the waiver requirements in Section 53-6-206;(iv)is qualified to be certified as a law enforcement officer, as defined in Section 53-13-103; and(v)before the date of the election, will have been a resident of the county in which the individual seeks office for at least one year.(e)(i)An individual filing a declaration of candidacy for the office of attorney general shall submit with the individual's declaration:(A)a letter from the Utah Supreme Court, affirming that the individual is an attorney in good standing;(B)proof of the individual's application with the Utah State Bar, with an affidavit describing the status of the individual's application; or(C)an affidavit describing how the individual intends to comply with the requirements for office of attorney general, described in Article VII, Sec. 3, Utah Constitution, prior to taking office.(ii)In addition to the requirements described in Subsection (3)(e)(i), an individual shall also provide the filing officer with the individual's license number with:(A)the Utah State Bar, if the individual is a member; or(B)any other state bar association, if the individual is a member.(iii)An individual filing the declaration of candidacy for the office of attorney general shall also make the conflict of interest disclosure described in Section 20A-11-1603.(f)Before accepting a declaration of candidacy for the office of governor, lieutenant governor, state auditor, state treasurer, state legislator, or State Board of Education member, the filing officer shall ensure that the individual filing the declaration of candidacy also makes the conflict of interest disclosure described in Section 20A-11-1603.(4)If an individual who files a declaration of candidacy does not meet the qualification requirements for the office the individual is seeking, the filing officer may not accept the individual's declaration of candidacy.(5)If an individual who files a declaration of candidacy meets the requirements described in Subsection (3), the filing officer shall:(a)inform the individual that:(i)subject to Section 20A-6-109, the individual's name will appear on the ballot as the individual's name is written on the individual's declaration of candidacy;(ii)the individual may be required to comply with state or local campaign finance disclosure laws; and(iii)the individual is required to file a financial statement before the individual's political convention under:(A)Section 20A-11-204 for a candidate for constitutional office;(B)Section 20A-11-303 for a candidate for the Legislature; or(C)local campaign finance disclosure laws, if applicable;(b)except for a presidential candidate, provide the individual with a copy of the current campaign financial disclosure laws for the office the individual is seeking and inform the individual that failure to comply will result in disqualification as a candidate and removal of the individual's name from the ballot;(c)(i)provide the individual with a copy of Section 20A-7-801 regarding the Statewide Electronic Voter Information Website Program and inform the individual of the submission deadline under Subsection 20A-7-801(4)(a);(ii)inform the individual that the individual must provide the filing officer with an email address that the individual actively monitors:(A)to receive a communication from a filing officer or an election officer; and(B)if the individual wishes to display a candidate profile on the Statewide Electronic Voter Information Website, to submit to the website the biographical and other information described in Subsection 20A-7-801(4)(a)(ii);(iii)inform the individual that the email address described in Subsection (5)(c)(ii) is not a record under Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act; and(iv)obtain from the individual the email address described in Subsection (5)(c)(ii);(d)provide the candidate with a copy of the pledge of fair campaign practices described under Section 20A-9-206 and inform the candidate that:(i)signing the pledge is voluntary; and(ii)signed pledges shall be filed with the filing officer;(e)accept the individual's declaration of candidacy; and(f)if the individual has filed for a partisan office, provide a certified copy of the declaration of candidacy to the chair of the county or state political party of which the individual is a member.(6)If the candidate elects to sign the pledge of fair campaign practices, the filing officer shall:(a)accept the candidate's pledge; and(b)if the candidate has filed for a partisan office, provide a certified copy of the candidate's pledge to the chair of the county or state political party of which the candidate is a member.(7)(a)Except for a candidate for president or vice president of the United States, the form of the declaration of candidacy shall:(i)be substantially as follows:"State of Utah, County of ____I, ______________, declare my candidacy for the office of ____, seeking the nomination of the ____ party.  I do solemnly swear, under penalty of perjury, that: I will meet the qualifications to hold the office, both legally and constitutionally, if selected; I reside at _____________ in the City or Town of ____, Utah, Zip Code ____ Phone No. ____; I will not knowingly violate any law governing campaigns and elections; if filing via a designated agent, I will be out of the state of Utah during the entire candidate filing period; I will file all campaign financial disclosure reports as required by law; and I understand that failure to do so will result in my disqualification as a candidate for this office and removal of my name from the ballot.  The mailing address that I designate for receiving official election notices is ___________________________.____________________________________________________________________Subscribed and sworn before me this __________(month\day\year).Notary Public (or other officer qualified to administer oath)."; and(ii)require the candidate to state, in the sworn statement described in Subsection (7)(a)(i):(A)the registered political party of which the candidate is a member; or(B)that the candidate is not a member of a registered political party.(b)An agent designated under Subsection 20A-9-202(1)(c) to file a declaration of candidacy may not sign the form described in Subsection (7)(a) or Section 20A-9-408.5.(8)(a)Except for a candidate for president or vice president of the United States, the fee for filing a declaration of candidacy is:(i)$50 for candidates for the local school district board; and(ii)$50 plus 1/8 of 1% of the total salary for the full term of office legally paid to the person holding the office for all other federal, state, and county offices.(b)Except for presidential candidates, the filing officer shall refund the filing fee to any candidate:(i)who is disqualified; or(ii)who the filing officer determines has filed improperly.(c)(i)The county clerk shall immediately pay to the county treasurer all fees received from candidates.(ii)The lieutenant governor shall:(A)apportion to and pay to the county treasurers of the various counties all fees received for filing of nomination certificates or acceptances; and(B)ensure that each county receives that proportion of the total amount paid to the lieutenant governor from the congressional district that the total vote of that county for all candidates for representative in Congress bears to the total vote of all counties within the congressional district for all candidates for representative in Congress.(d)(i)A person who is unable to pay the filing fee may file a declaration of candidacy without payment of the filing fee upon a prima facie showing of impecuniosity as evidenced by an affidavit of impecuniosity filed with the filing officer and, if requested by the filing officer, a financial statement filed at the time the affidavit is submitted.(ii)A person who is able to pay the filing fee may not claim impecuniosity.(iii)(A)False statements made on an affidavit of impecuniosity or a financial statement filed under this section shall be subject to the criminal penalties provided under Sections 76-8-503 and 76-8-504 and any other applicable criminal provision.(B)Conviction of a criminal offense under Subsection (8)(d)(iii)(A) shall be considered an offense under this title for the purposes of assessing the penalties provided in Subsection 20A-1-609(2).(iv)The filing officer shall ensure that the affidavit of impecuniosity is printed in substantially the following form:"Affidavit of ImpecuniosityIndividual Name ____________________________Address_____________________________Phone Number _________________I,__________________________(name), do solemnly [swear] [affirm], under penalty of law for false statements, that, owing to my poverty, I am unable to pay the filing fee required by law.Date ______________ Signature________________________________________________ AffiantSubscribed and sworn to before me on ___________ (month\day\year)______________________(signature)Name and Title of Officer Authorized to Administer Oath ______________________".(v)The filing officer shall provide to a person who requests an affidavit of impecuniosity a statement printed in substantially the following form, which may be included on the affidavit of impecuniosity:"Filing a false statement is a criminal offense.  In accordance with Section 20A-1-609, a candidate who is found guilty of filing a false statement, in addition to being subject to criminal penalties, will be removed from the ballot."(vi)The filing officer may request that a person who makes a claim of impecuniosity under this Subsection (8)(d) file a financial statement on a form prepared by the election official.(9)An individual who fails to file a declaration of candidacy or certificate of nomination within the time provided in this chapter is ineligible for nomination to office.(10)A declaration of candidacy filed under this section may not be amended or modified after the final date established for filing a declaration of candidacy.

Section 4:
Section 4. Section 20A-9-201.5 is amended to read:20A-9-201.5. Declaration of candidacy filing period for a qualified political party.For a qualified political party, :(1)except as provided in Subsection (2), the filing period to file a declaration of candidacy for an elective office that is to be filled at the next regular general election:(1)(a)begins at 8 a.m. on the later of:(a)January 2 of the year in which the next regular general election is held; or(b)if January 2 is not a business day, the first business day after January 2first business day in January of an even-numbered year; and(2)(b)ends at 5 p.m. on the fourthfifth business day after the day on which the filing period begins. in January of an even-numbered year; and(2)for the 2026 election year only, the filing period to file a declaration of candidacy for the office of United States representative:(a)begins at 8 a.m. on March 9, 2026; and(b)ends at 5 p.m. on March 13, 2026.

Section 5:
Section 5. Section 20A-9-406 is amended to read:20A-9-406. Qualified political party -- Requirements and exemptions.The following provisions apply to a qualified political party:(1)the qualified political party shall, no later than 5 p.m. on the first Monday of October of each odd-numbered year, certify to the lieutenant governor the identity of one or more registered political parties whose members may vote for the qualified political party's candidates and whether unaffiliated voters may vote for the qualified political party's candidates;(2)the following provisions do not apply to a nomination for the qualified political party:(a)Subsections 20A-9-403(1) through (3)(b) and (3)(d)Subsections (3)(d)(ii) through (4)(a);(b)Subsection 20A-9-403(5)(c); and(c)Section 20A-9-405;(3)an individual may only seek the nomination of the qualified political party by using a method described in Section 20A-9-407, Section 20A-9-408, or both;(4)the qualified political party shall comply with the provisions of Sections 20A-9-407, 20A-9-408, and 20A-9-409;(5)notwithstanding Subsection 20A-6-301(1)(a), (1)(e), or (2)(a), each election officer shall ensure that a ballot described in Section 20A-6-301 includes each individual nominated by a qualified political party:(a)under the qualified political party's name  , if any; or(b)under the title of the qualified registered political party as designated by the qualified political party in the certification described in Subsection (1), or, if none is designated, then under some suitable title;(6)notwithstanding Subsection 20A-6-302(1)(a), each election officer shall ensure, for ballots in regular general elections, that each candidate who is nominated by the qualified political party is listed by party;(7)notwithstanding Subsection 20A-6-304(1)(e), each election officer shall ensure that the party designation of each candidate who is nominated by the qualified political party is displayed adjacent to the candidate's name on a mechanical ballot;(8)"candidates for elective office," defined in Subsection 20A-9-101(1)(a), also includes an individual who files a declaration of candidacy under Section 20A-9-407 or 20A-9-408 to run in a regular general election for a federal office, constitutional office, multicounty office, or county office;(9)an individual who is nominated by, or seeking the nomination of, the qualified political party is not required to comply with Subsection 20A-9-201(1)(c);(10)notwithstanding Subsection 20A-9-403(3), the qualified political party is entitled to have each of the qualified political party's candidates for elective office appear on the primary ballot of the qualified political party with an indication that each candidate is a candidate for the qualified political party;(11)notwithstanding Subsection 20A-9-403(4)(a), the lieutenant governor shall include on the list provided by the lieutenant governor to the county clerks:(a)the names of all candidates of the qualified political party for federal, constitutional, multicounty, and county offices; and(b)the names of unopposed candidates for elective office who have been nominated by the qualified political party and instruct the county clerks to exclude such candidates from the primary-election ballot;(12)notwithstanding Subsection 20A-9-403(5)(c), a candidate who is unopposed for an elective office in the regular primary election of the qualified political party is nominated by the party for that office without appearing on the primary ballot; and(13)notwithstanding the provisions of Subsections 20A-9-403(1) and (2) and Section 20A-9-405, the qualified political party is entitled to have the names of its candidates for elective office featured with party affiliation on the ballot at a regular general election.

Section 6:
Section 6. Section 20A-9-407 is amended to read:20A-9-407. Convention process to seek the nomination of a qualified political party.(1)This section describes the requirements for a member of a qualified political party who is seeking the nomination of a qualified political party for an elective office through the qualified political party's convention process.(2)Notwithstanding Subsection 20A-9-201(7)(a), the form of the declaration of candidacy for a member of a qualified political party who is nominated by, or who is seeking the nomination of, the qualified political party under this section shall be substantially as described in Section 20A-9-408.5.(3)Notwithstanding Subsection 20A-9-202(1)(a), and except as provided in Subsection 20A-9-202(4), a member of a qualified political party who, under this section, is seeking the nomination of the qualified political party for an elective office that is to be filled at the next general election, shall:(a)except as provided in Subsection 20A-9-202(1)(c), file a declaration of candidacy in person with the filing officer during the applicable declaration of candidacy filing period described in Section 20A-9-201.5; and(b)pay the filing fee.(4)Notwithstanding Subsection 20A-9-202(2)(a), a member of a qualified political party who, under this section, is seeking the nomination of the qualified political party for the office of district attorney within a multicounty prosecution district that is to be filled at the next general election, shall:(a)file a declaration of candidacy with the county clerk designated in the interlocal agreement creating the prosecution district during the applicable declaration of candidacy filing period described in Section 20A-9-201.5; and(b)pay the filing fee.(5)Notwithstanding Subsection 20A-9-202(3)(a)(iii), a lieutenant governor candidate who files as the joint-ticket running mate of an individual who is nominated by a qualified political party, under this section, for the office of governor shall, during the applicable declaration of candidacy filing period described in Section 20A-9-201.5, file a declaration of candidacy and submit a letter from the candidate for governor that names the lieutenant governor candidate as a joint-ticket running mate.(6)(a)A qualified political party that nominates a candidate under this section shall certify the name of the candidate to the lieutenant governor before the deadline described in Subsection 20A-9-202(1)(b).(b)The lieutenant governor shall include, in the primary ballot certification or, for a race where a primary is not held because the candidate is unopposed, in the general election ballot certification, the name of each candidate nominated by a qualified political party under this section.(7)Notwithstanding Subsection 20A-9-701(2), the ballot shall, for each candidate who is nominated by a qualified political party under this section, designate the qualified political party that nominated the candidate.

Section 7:
Section 7. Section 20A-9-408 is amended to read:20A-9-408. Signature-gathering process to seek the nomination of a qualified political party -- Removal of signature.(1)This section describes the requirements for a member of a qualified political party who is seeking the nomination of the qualified political party for an elective office through the signature-gathering process described in this section.(2)Notwithstanding Subsection 20A-9-201(7)(a), the form of the declaration of candidacy for a member of a qualified political party who is nominated by, or who is seeking the nomination of, the qualified political party under this section shall be substantially as described in Section 20A-9-408.5.(3)Notwithstanding Subsection 20A-9-202(1)(a), and except as provided in Subsection 20A-9-202(4), a member of a qualified political party who, under this section, is seeking the nomination of the qualified political party for an elective office that is to be filled at the next general election shall:(a)except to the extent otherwise provided in Subsection (13)(a), during the applicable declaration of candidacy filing period described in Section 20A-9-201.5, and before gathering signatures under this section, file with the filing officer on a form approved by the lieutenant governor a notice of intent to gather signatures for candidacy that includes:(i)the name of the member who will attempt to become a candidate for a registered political party under this section;(ii)the name of the registered political party for which the member is seeking nomination;(iii)the office for which the member is seeking to become a candidate;(iv)the address and telephone number of the member; and(v)other information required by the lieutenant governor;(b)except as provided in Subsection 20A-9-202(1)(c), file a declaration of candidacy, in person, with the filing officer during the applicable declaration of candidacy filing period described in Section 20A-9-201.5; and(c)pay the filing fee.(4)Notwithstanding Subsection 20A-9-202(2)(a), a member of a qualified political party who, under this section, is seeking the nomination of the qualified political party for the office of district attorney within a multicounty prosecution district that is to be filled at the next general election shall:(a)during the applicable declaration of candidacy filing period described in Section 20A-9-201.5, and before gathering signatures under this section, file with the filing officer on a form approved by the lieutenant governor a notice of intent to gather signatures for candidacy that includes:(i)the name of the member who will attempt to become a candidate for a registered political party under this section;(ii)the name of the registered political party for which the member is seeking nomination;(iii)the office for which the member is seeking to become a candidate;(iv)the address and telephone number of the member; and(v)other information required by the lieutenant governor;(b)except as provided in Subsection 20A-9-202(1)(c), file a declaration of candidacy, in person, with the filing officer during the applicable declaration of candidacy filing period described in Section 20A-9-201.5; and(c)pay the filing fee.(5)Notwithstanding Subsection 20A-9-202(3)(a)(iii), a lieutenant governor candidate who files as the joint-ticket running mate of an individual who is nominated by a qualified political party, under this section, for the office of governor shall, during the applicable declaration of candidacy filing period described in Section 20A-9-201.5, file a declaration of candidacy and submit a letter from the candidate for governor that names the lieutenant governor candidate as a joint-ticket running mate.(6)The lieutenant governor shall ensure that the certification described in Subsection 20A-9-701(1) also includes the name of each candidate nominated by a qualified political party under this section.(7)Notwithstanding Subsection 20A-9-701(2), the ballot shall, for each candidate who is nominated by a qualified political party under this section, designate the qualified political party that nominated the candidate.(8)A member of a qualified political party may seek the nomination of the qualified political party for an elective office by:(a)complying with the requirements described in this section; and(b)collecting signatures, on a form approved by the lieutenant governor that complies with Subsection 20A-9-405(3), during the period beginning on the day on which the member files a notice of intent to gather signatures and ending at the applicable deadline described in Subsection (12), in the following amounts:(i)for a statewide race, 28,000 signatures of registered voters in the state who are permitted by the qualified political party to vote for the qualified political party's candidates in a primary election;(ii)except as provided in Subsection (13)(b), for a congressional district race, 7,000 signatures of registered voters who are residents of the congressional district and are permitted by the qualified political party to vote for the qualified political party's candidates in a primary election;(iii)for a state Senate district race, 2,000 signatures of registered voters who are residents of the state Senate district and are permitted by the qualified political party to vote for the qualified political party's candidates in a primary election;(iv)for a state House district race, 1,000 signatures of registered voters who are residents of the state House district and are permitted by the qualified political party to vote for the qualified political party's candidates in a primary election;(v)for a State Board of Education race, the lesser of:(A)2,000 signatures of registered voters who are residents of the State Board of Education district and are permitted by the qualified political party to vote for the qualified political party's candidates in a primary election; or(B)3% of the registered voters of the qualified political party who are residents of the applicable State Board of Education district; and(vi)for a county office race, signatures of 3% of the registered voters who are residents of the area permitted to vote for the county office and are permitted by the qualified political party to vote for the qualified political party's candidates in a primary election.(9)(a)This Subsection (9) applies only to the manual candidate qualification process.(b)In order for a member of the qualified political party to qualify as a candidate for the qualified political party's nomination for an elective office under this section, using the manual candidate qualification process, the member shall:(i)collect the signatures on a form approved by the lieutenant governor, using the same circulation and verification requirements described in Sections 20A-7-105 and 20A-7-204; and(ii)in accordance with Section 20A-9-408.3, submit the signatures to the election officer before the applicable deadline described in Subsection (12).(c)Upon timely receipt of the signatures described in Subsections (8) and (9)(b), and in accordance with Section 20A-9-408.3, the election officer shall, no later than the earlier of 14 calendar days after the day on which the election officer receives the signatures, or one day before the day on which the qualified political party holds the convention to select a nominee for the elective office to which the signature packets relate:(i)check the name of each individual who completes the verification for a signature packet to determine whether each individual is at least 18 years old;(ii)submit the name of each individual described in Subsection (9)(c)(i) who is not at least 18 years old to the attorney general and the county attorney;(iii)with the assistance of the county clerk as applicable, determine whether each signer is a registered voter who is qualified to sign the petition, using the same method, described in Section 20A-1-1002, used to verify a signature on a petition; and(iv)certify whether each name is that of a registered voter who is qualified to sign the signature packet.(d)(i)A registered voter who physically signs a form under Subsections (8) and (9)(b) may have the voter's signature removed from the form by, no later than 5 p.m. three business days after the day on which the member submits the signature form to the election officer, submitting to the election officer a statement requesting that the voter's signature be removed.(ii)A statement described in Subsection (9)(d)(i) shall comply with the requirements described in Subsection 20A-1-1003(2).(iii)With the assistance of the county clerk as applicable, the election officer shall use the procedures described in Subsection 20A-1-1003(3) to determine whether to remove an individual's signature after receiving a timely, valid statement requesting removal of the signature.(e)(i)An election officer shall, in accordance with this Subsection (9)(e) and rules made under Section 20A-3a-106, conduct regular audits of signature comparisons made between signatures gathered under this section and voter signatures maintained by the election officer.(ii)An individual who conducts an audit of signature comparisons under this section may not audit the individual's own work.(iii)The election officer shall:(A)audit 1% of all signature comparisons described in Subsection (9)(e)(i) to determine the accuracy of the comparisons made;(B)record the individuals who conducted the audit;(C)record the audit results;(D)provide additional training or staff reassignments, as needed, based on the results of an audit described in Subsection (9)(e)(i); and(E)record any remedial action taken.(iv)The audit results described in Subsection (9)(e)(iii)(C) are a public record.(f)An election officer who certifies signatures under Subsection (9)(c) or  20A-9-403(3)(d) shall, after certifying enough signatures to establish that a candidate has reached the applicable signature threshold described in Subsection (8) or 20A-9-403(3)(a), as applicable, continue to certify signatures submitted for the candidate in excess of the number of signatures required, until the election officer either:(i)certifies signatures equal to 110% of the applicable signature threshold; or(ii)has reviewed all signatures submitted for the candidate before reaching an amount equal to 110% of the applicable signature threshold.(10)(a)This Subsection (10) applies only to the electronic candidate qualification process.(b)In order for a member of the qualified political party to qualify as a candidate for the qualified political party's nomination for an elective office under this section, the member shall, before the deadline described in Subsection (12), collect signatures electronically:(i)in accordance with Section 20A-21-201; and(ii)using progressive screens, in a format approved by the lieutenant governor, that complies with Subsection 20A-9-405(4).(c)Upon timely receipt of the signatures described in Subsections (8) and (9)(b), the election officer shall, no later than the earlier of 14 calendar days after the day on which the election officer receives the signatures, or one day before the day on which the qualified political party holds the convention to select a nominee for the elective office to which the signature packets relate:(i)check the name of each individual who completes the verification for a signature to determine whether each individual is at least 18 years old; and(ii)submit the name of each individual described in Subsection (10)(c)(i) who is not at least 18 years old to the attorney general and the county attorney.(11)(a)An individual may not gather signatures under this section until after the individual files a notice of intent to gather signatures for candidacy described in this section.(b)An individual who files a notice of intent to gather signatures for candidacy, described in Subsection (3)(a) or (4)(a), is, beginning on the day on which the individual files the notice of intent to gather signatures for candidacy:(i)required to comply with the reporting requirements that a candidate for office is required to comply with; and(ii)subject to the same enforcement provisions, and civil and criminal penalties, that apply to a candidate for office in relation to the reporting requirements described in Subsection (11)(b)(i).(c)Upon timely receipt of the signatures described in Subsections (8) and (9)(b), or Subsections (8) and (10)(b), the election officer shall, no later than the day before the day on which the qualified political party holds the convention to select a nominee for the elective office to which the signature packets relate, notify the qualified political party and the lieutenant governor of the name of each member of the qualified political party who qualifies as a nominee of the qualified political party, under this section, for the elective office to which the convention relates.(d)Upon receipt of a notice of intent to gather signatures for candidacy described in this section, the lieutenant governor shall post the notice of intent to gather signatures for candidacy on the lieutenant governor's website in the same location that the lieutenant governor posts a declaration of candidacy.(12)The deadline before which a member of a qualified political party must collect and submit signatures to the election officer under this section is 5 p.m. on the last business day that is at least 14 calendar days before the day on which the qualified political party's convention for the office begins.(13)For the 2026 election year only, an individual who desires to gather signatures to seek the nomination of a qualified political party for the office of United States representative shall:(a)in accordance with Subsection (3)(a), file a notice of intent to gather signatures during the period beginning at 8 a.m. on the first business day of January and ending at 5 p.m. on March 13, 2026; and(b)during the period beginning on the day on which the individual files the notice of intent to gather signatures and ending at 5 p.m. on March 13, 2026, on a form approved by the lieutenant governor that complies with Subsection 20A-9-405(3), collect 7,000 signatures of registered voters who are residents of the state and are permitted by the qualified political party to vote for the qualified political party's candidates in a primary election.

Section 8:
Section 8. Section 20A-9-410 is amended to read:20A-9-410. Rulemaking authority.The director of elections, within the Office of the Lieutenant Governor, shall make rules, in accordance with the provisions of Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, :(1)relating to procedures for complying with, and verifying compliance with, the candidate nominating process described in this part.; and(2)that permit an individual to submit signatures to qualify as a candidate for placement on the primary election ballot at least once each week during the signature gathering period, regardless of whether the number of signatures gathered has reached the signature threshold for the applicable office.

Section 9:
Section 9. Section 20A-9-502 is amended to read:20A-9-502. Certificate of nomination -- Contents -- Circulation -- Verification -- Criminal penalty -- Removal of petition signature.(1)The candidate shall:(a)prepare a certificate of nomination in substantially the following form:"State of Utah, County of ______________________________________________I, ______________, declare my intention of becoming an unaffiliated candidate for the political group designated as ____ for the office of ____.  I do solemnly swear that I can qualify to hold that office both legally and constitutionally if selected, and that I reside at ____ Street, in the city of ____, county of ____, state of ______, zip code ____, phone ____, and that I am providing, or have provided, the required number of holographic signatures of registered voters required by law; that as a candidate at the next election I will not knowingly violate any election or campaign law; that, if filing via a designated agent for an office other than president of the United States, I will be out of the state of Utah during the entire candidate filing period; I will file all campaign financial disclosure reports as required by law; and I understand that failure to do so will result in my disqualification as a candidate for this office and removal of my name from the ballot.__________________________________________Subscribed and sworn to before me this ______(month\day\year).__________________________________________Notary Public (or other officerqualified to administer oaths)";(b)for each signature packet, bind signature sheets to a copy of the certificate of nomination and the circulator verification, that:(i)are printed on sheets of paper 8-1/2 inches long and 11 inches wide;(ii)are ruled with a horizontal line 3/4 inch from the top, with the space above that line blank for the purpose of binding;(iii)contain the name of the proposed candidate and the words "Unaffiliated Candidate Certificate of Nomination Petition" printed directly below the horizontal line;(iv)contain the word "Warning" printed directly under the words described in Subsection (1)(b)(iii);(v)contain, to the right of the word "Warning," the following statement printed in not less than eight-point, single leaded type:"It is a class A misdemeanor for anyone to knowingly sign a certificate of nomination signature sheet with any name other than the person's own name or more than once for the same candidate or if the person is not registered to vote in this state and does not intend to become registered to vote in this state before the county clerk certifies the signatures.";(vi)contain the following statement directly under the statement described in Subsection (1)(b)(v):"Each signer says:I have personally signed this petition with a holographic signature;I am registered to vote in Utah or intend to become registered to vote in Utah before the county clerk certifies my signature; andMy street address is written correctly after my name.";(vii)contain horizontally ruled lines, 3/8 inch apart under the statement described in Subsection (1)(b)(vi); and(viii)be vertically divided into columns as follows:(A)the first column shall appear at the extreme left of the sheet, be 5/8 inch wide, be headed with "For Office Use Only," and be subdivided with a light vertical line down the middle;(B)the next column shall be 2-1/2 inches wide, headed "Registered Voter's Printed Name (must be legible to be counted)";(C)the next column shall be 2-1/2 inches wide, headed "Holographic Signature of Registered Voter";(D)the next column shall be one inch wide, headed "Birth Date or Age (Optional)";(E)the final column shall be 4-3/8 inches wide, headed "Street Address, City, Zip Code"; and(F)at the bottom of the sheet, contain the following statement: "Birth date or age information is not required, but it may be used to verify your identity with voter registration records.  If you choose not to provide it, your signature may not be certified as a valid signature if you change your address before petition signatures are certified or if the information you provide does not match your voter registration records."; and(c)bind a final page to one or more signature sheets that are bound together that contains, except as provided by Subsection (3), the following printed statement:"VerificationState of Utah, County of ____I, _______________, of ____, hereby state that:I am at least 18 years old;All the names that appear on the signature sheets bound to this page were signed by persons who professed to be the persons whose names appear on the signature sheets, and each of them signed the person's name on the signature sheets in my presence;I believe that each has printed and signed the person's name and written the person's street address correctly, and that each signer is registered to vote in Utah or will register to vote in Utah before the county clerk certifies the signatures on the signature sheet.______________________________________________________________________(Signature) (Residence Address)(Date)".(2)An agent designated to file a certificate of nomination under Subsection 20A-9-503(2)(b) or (4)(b) may not sign the form described in Subsection (1)(a).(3)(a)The candidate shall circulate the nomination petition and ensure that the person in whose presence each signature sheet is signed:(i)is at least 18 years old; and(ii)verifies each signature sheet by completing the verification bound to one or more signature sheets that are bound together.(b)A person may not sign the circulator verification if the person signed a signature sheet bound to the verification.(4)(a)It is unlawful for any person to:(i)knowingly sign a certificate of nomination signature sheet:(A)with any name other than the person's own name;(B)more than once for the same candidate; or(C)if the person is not registered to vote in this state and does not intend to become registered to vote in this state before the county clerk certifies the signatures; or(ii)sign the verification of a certificate of nomination signature sheet if the person:(A)has not witnessed the signing by those persons whose names appear on the certificate of nomination signature sheet; or(B)knows that a person whose signature appears on the certificate of nomination signature sheet is not registered to vote in this state and does not intend to become registered to vote in this state.(b)Any person violating this Subsection (4) is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.(5)(a)To qualify for placement on the general election ballot, the candidate shall, no earlier than the start of the applicable declaration of candidacy period described in Section 20A-9-201.5 and no later than 5 p.m. on June 15 of the year in which the election will be held:(i)comply with Subsection 20A-9-503(1); and(ii)submit each signature packet to the county clerk where the majority of the signatures in the packet were collected, with signatures totaling:(A)at least 1,000 registered voters residing within the state when the nomination is for an office to be filled by the voters of the entire state; or(B)at least 300 registered voters residing within a political division or at least 5% of the registered voters residing within a political division, whichever is less, when the nomination is for an office to be filled by the voters of any political division smaller than the state.(b)A candidate has not complied with Subsection (5)(a)(ii), unless the county clerks verify that each required signature is a valid signature of a registered voter who is eligible to sign the signature packet and has not signed a signature packet to nominate another candidate for the same office.(c)In reviewing the signature packets, the county clerk shall count and certify only those persons who signed with a holographic signature, who:(i)are registered voters within the political division that the candidate seeks to represent; and(ii)did not sign any other certificate of nomination for that office.(d)The county clerk shall count and certify the number of registered voters who validly signed a signature packet, no later than 30 calendar days after the day on which the candidate submits the signature packet.(e)The candidate may supplement the signatures or amend the certificate of nomination or declaration of candidacy at any time on or before 5 p.m. on June 15 of the year in which the election will be held.(f)The county clerk shall use the procedures described in Section 20A-1-1002 to determine whether a signer is a registered voter who is qualified to sign the signature packet.(6)(a)A voter who signs a signature packet under this section may have the voter's signature removed from the signature packet by, no later than 5 p.m. three business days after the day on which the candidate submits the signature packet to the county clerk, submitting to the county clerk a statement requesting that the voter's signature be removed.(b)A statement described in Subsection (6)(a) shall comply with the requirements described in Subsection 20A-1-1003(2).(c)The county clerk shall use the procedures described in Subsection 20A-1-1003(3) to determine whether to remove an individual's signature from a signature packet after receiving a timely, valid statement requesting removal of the signature.

Section 10:
Section 10. Section 20A-14-203 is amended to read:20A-14-203. Becoming a member of a local board of education -- Declaration of candidacy -- Election.(1)An individual may become a candidate for a local school board by:(a)filing a declaration of candidacy with the county clerk during the applicable declaration of candidacy filing period described in Section 20A-9-201.5; and(b)paying the fee described in Section 20A-9-202.(2)(a)The term of office for an individual elected to a local board of education is four years, beginning on the first Monday in January after the election.(b)A member of a local board of education shall serve until a successor is:(i)elected; or(ii)appointed and takes or signs the constitutional oath of office.

Section 11:
Section 11.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect:(1)except as provided in Subsection (2), February 8, 2026; or(2)if approved by two-thirds of all members elected to each house:(a)upon approval by the governor;(b)without the governor's signature, the day following the constitutional time limit of Utah Constitution, Article VII, Section 8; or(c)in the case of a veto, the date of veto override.